fr: Jambons de Mayence, jambon de Mayence
de: Mainzer Schinken

fr: Jambons ibériques de cebo, Jamón ibérico de cebo, jambon ibérique de gavage
es: jamón ibérico de cebo

fr: Jambons ibériques de gland, jambon ibérique de gland, jambon ibérique de bellota, pata negra bellota
es: jamón ibérico de bellota

en: Smoked cured hams, smoked cured ham, raw smoked cured ham
fr: Jambons crus fumés, jambon cru fumé, jambons secs fumés, jambon sec fumé

en: cured smoked ham with reduced fat
fr: Jambon cru fumé allégé en matières grasses
hr: Sušena pršuta sa smanjenom masnoćom
it: Prosciutto crudo stagionato affumicato con grassi ridotti

de: Schwarzwälder Schinken
bg: Шварцвалдска шунка
fr: Jambons de la Forêt Noire, jambon de la Forêt Noire, jambons forêt noire

en: Westphalian ham
fr: Jambons de Westphalie, jambon de Westphalie

en: Specks
es: Speck
fr: Specks, Speck, Speks, Spek
hr: Mrlje

en: Prepared meats with less salt
es: Carnes preparadas con menos sal
fi: kypsennetyt lihat, joissa vähemmän suolaa
fr: Charcuteries à teneur réduite en sel
hr: Pripremljeno meso s manje soli
hu: Feldolgozott hús kevés sóval
it: Carne pronta a basso contenuto di sale
nl: Vleeswaren met minder zout

en: Rillettes
xx: Rillettes
ca: Rostes
fi: Rilletet
he: רייט

en: Potted meats, Meat rillettes
ca: Carns en pot, Rostes de carn
de: Fleischaufstriche, Rilletten, Pottsusen
es: Carnes en maceta
fr: Rillettes de viande
hr: Meso u loncima
it: Cibi in vasetto
nl: Potjesvlezen, Potjesvlees

en: white meat rillettes
de: Rillettes aus weißem Fleisch
fr: Rillettes de viande blanche
hr: Rileti od bijelog mesa
it: Rillettes di carni bianche
nl: Wit vleesriletten

en: hare rillettes
fr: Rillettes de lapin
hr: Hare rillettes
nl: Haasrilette

en: Poultry rillettes
de: Geflügelfleischaufstriche
fr: Rillettes de volaille
hr: Rileti od peradi

en: Goose rillettes, Rillettes goose
fr: Rillettes d'oie, rillettes à l'oie

en: Pure goose rillettes, Rillettes pure goose
fr: Rillettes pur oie

en: Duck rillettes
de: Entenfleischaufstriche
fr: Rillettes de canard, rillettes au canard
hr: Pačji rillettes
it: Rillette d'anatra
nl: Eendenrillettes

en: Turkey rillettes
fr: Rillettes de dinde

en: chicken rillettes
de: Hühnchen-Rillettes, Hühnchen Rillettes, Hühnchenrillettes
fi: Kanarilletet
fr: Rillettes de poulet, rillettes au poulet
hr: Pileći rileti
nl: Kiprillettes

en: Lamb rillettes
fr: Rillettes d’agneau